extensions/1013418_russian-english-dictionary/russian_english_dictionary-1.1/dictionaries/Russian-English_Bilingual.aff
SFX 117 Y 162
SFX 117   чься жешься       чься
SFX 117   чься жется        чься
SFX 117   чься жетесь       чься
SFX 117   чься жемся        чься
SFX 117   чься жёшься       чься
SFX 117   чься жётся        чься
SFX 117   чься жётесь       чься
SFX 117   чься жёмся        чься
SFX 117   чься гутся        чься
SFX 117   чься гусь         чься
SFX 117   чь   жешь         чь
SFX 117   чь   жете         чь
SFX 117   чь   жет          чь
SFX 117   чь   жем          чь
SFX 117   чь   жёшь         чь
SFX 117   чь   жёте         чь
SFX 117   чь   жёт          чь
SFX 117   чь   жём          чь
SFX 117   чь   гут          чь
SFX 117   чь   гу           чь
SFX 117   ься  ся           уться
SFX 117   ься  ся           ояться
SFX 117   ься  ся           [жшщч]аться
SFX 117   ваться ешься        аваться
SFX 117   ваться ется         аваться
SFX 117   ваться етесь        аваться
SFX 117   ваться емся         аваться
SFX 117   ваться ются         аваться
SFX 117   ваться юсь          аваться
SFX 117   ваться ёшься        аваться
SFX 117   ваться ётся         аваться
SFX 117   ваться ётесь        аваться
SFX 117   ваться ёмся         аваться
SFX 117   вать ешь          авать
SFX 117   вать ете          авать
SFX 117   вать ет           авать
SFX 117   вать ем           авать
SFX 117   вать ют           авать
SFX 117   вать ю            авать
SFX 117   вать ёшь          авать
SFX 117   вать ёте          авать
SFX 117   вать ёт           авать
SFX 117   вать ём           авать
SFX 117   уться ешься        уться
SFX 117   уться ется         уться
SFX 117   уться етесь        уться
SFX 117   уться емся         уться
SFX 117   уться ёшься        уться
SFX 117   уться ётся         уться
SFX 117   уться ётесь        уться
SFX 117   уться ёмся         уться
SFX 117   уть  у            уть
SFX 117   уть  ешь          уть
SFX 117   уть  ете          уть
SFX 117   уть  ет           уть
SFX 117   уть  ем           уть
SFX 117   уть  ёшь          уть
SFX 117   уть  ёте          уть
SFX 117   уть  ёт           уть
SFX 117   уть  ём           уть
SFX 117   ться сь           уться
SFX 117   ться ешься        [^аеоу]яться
SFX 117   ться ется         [^аеоу]яться
SFX 117   ться етесь        [^аеоу]яться
SFX 117   ться емся         [^аеоу]яться
SFX 117   ться ются         [^аеоу]яться
SFX 117   ться юсь          [^аеоу]яться
SFX 117   ть   т            уть
SFX 117   ть   т            оять
SFX 117   ть   т            [жшщч]ать
SFX 117   ть   ешь          [^аеоу]ять
SFX 117   ть   ете          [^аеоу]ять
SFX 117   ть   ет           [^аеоу]ять
SFX 117   ть   ем           [^аеоу]ять
SFX 117   ть   ют           [^аеоу]ять
SFX 117   ть   ю            [^аеоу]ять
SFX 117   яться ишься        ояться
SFX 117   яться ится         ояться
SFX 117   яться итесь        ояться
SFX 117   яться имся         ояться
SFX 117   яться ешься        [аеу]яться
SFX 117   яться ется         [аеу]яться
SFX 117   яться етесь        [аеу]яться
SFX 117   яться емся         [аеу]яться
SFX 117   яться ются         [аеу]яться
SFX 117   яться юсь          [аеоу]яться
SFX 117   ять  ишь          оять
SFX 117   ять  ите          оять
SFX 117   ять  ит           оять
SFX 117   ять  им           оять
SFX 117   ять  ешь          [аеу]ять
SFX 117   ять  ете          [аеу]ять
SFX 117   ять  ет           [аеу]ять
SFX 117   ять  ем           [аеу]ять
SFX 117   ять  ют           [аеу]ять
SFX 117   ять  ю            [аеоу]ять
SFX 117   оваться уешься       оваться
SFX 117   оваться уется        оваться
SFX 117   оваться уетесь       оваться
SFX 117   оваться уемся        оваться
SFX 117   оваться уются        оваться
SFX 117   оваться уюсь         оваться
SFX 117   овать уешь         овать
SFX 117   овать уете         овать
SFX 117   овать ует          овать
SFX 117   овать уем          овать
SFX 117   овать уют          овать
SFX 117   овать ую           овать
SFX 117   еваться уешься       [цжшщч]еваться
SFX 117   еваться уется        [цжшщч]еваться
SFX 117   еваться уетесь       [цжшщч]еваться
SFX 117   еваться уемся        [цжшщч]еваться
SFX 117   еваться уются        [цжшщч]еваться
SFX 117   еваться уюсь         [цжшщч]еваться
SFX 117   еваться юешься       [^цжшщч]еваться
SFX 117   еваться юется        [^цжшщч]еваться
SFX 117   еваться юетесь       [^цжшщч]еваться
SFX 117   еваться юемся        [^цжшщч]еваться
SFX 117   еваться юются        [^цжшщч]еваться
SFX 117   еваться ююсь         [^цжшщч]еваться
SFX 117   евать уешь         [цжшщч]евать
SFX 117   евать уете         [цжшщч]евать
SFX 117   евать ует          [цжшщч]евать
SFX 117   евать уем          [цжшщч]евать
SFX 117   евать уют          [цжшщч]евать
SFX 117   евать ую           [цжшщч]евать
SFX 117   евать юешь         [^цжшщч]евать
SFX 117   евать юете         [^цжшщч]евать
SFX 117   евать юет          [^цжшщч]евать
SFX 117   евать юем          [^цжшщч]евать
SFX 117   евать юют          [^цжшщч]евать
SFX 117   евать юю           [^цжшщч]евать
SFX 117   аться утся         даться
SFX 117   аться усь          даться
SFX 117   аться усь          [жшщч]аться
SFX 117   аться ишься        [жшщч]аться
SFX 117   аться ится         [жшщч]аться
SFX 117   аться итесь        [жшщч]аться
SFX 117   аться имся         [жшщч]аться
SFX 117   аться ешься        даться
SFX 117   аться ется         даться
SFX 117   аться етесь        даться
SFX 117   аться емся         даться
SFX 117   аться ёшься        даться
SFX 117   аться ётся         даться
SFX 117   аться ётесь        даться
SFX 117   аться ёмся         даться
SFX 117   ать  ут           дать
SFX 117   ать  у            дать
SFX 117   ать  у            [жшщч]ать
SFX 117   ать  ишь          [жшщч]ать
SFX 117   ать  ите          [жшщч]ать
SFX 117   ать  ит           [жшщч]ать
SFX 117   ать  им           [жшщч]ать
SFX 117   ать  ешь          дать
SFX 117   ать  ете          дать
SFX 117   ать  ет           дать
SFX 117   ать  ем           дать
SFX 117   ать  ёшь          дать
SFX 117   ать  ёте          дать
SFX 117   ать  ёт           дать
SFX 117   ать  ём           дать

SFX 118 Y 70
SFX 118 иться иться .
SFX 118 иться усь .
SFX 118 иться имся .
SFX 118 иться ишься .
SFX 118 иться итесь .
SFX 118 иться ится .
SFX 118 иться атся .
SFX 118 иться ился .
SFX 118 иться илась .
SFX 118 иться илось .
SFX 118 иться ились .
SFX 118 иться ась .
SFX 118 иться ившись .
SFX 118 иться ься .
SFX 118 иться ьтесь .
SFX 118 иться ащийся .
SFX 118 иться ащегося .
SFX 118 иться ащемуся .
SFX 118 иться ащегося .
SFX 118 иться ащийся .
SFX 118 иться ащимся .
SFX 118 иться ащемся .
SFX 118 иться ащаяся .
SFX 118 иться ащейся .
SFX 118 иться ащейся .
SFX 118 иться ащуюся .
SFX 118 иться ащейся .
SFX 118 иться ащеюся .
SFX 118 иться ащейся .
SFX 118 иться ащееся .
SFX 118 иться ащегося .
SFX 118 иться ащемуся .
SFX 118 иться ащееся .
SFX 118 иться ащимся .
SFX 118 иться ащемся .
SFX 118 иться ащиеся .
SFX 118 иться ащихся .
SFX 118 иться ащимся .
SFX 118 иться ащихся .
SFX 118 иться ащиеся .
SFX 118 иться ащимися .
SFX 118 иться ащихся .
SFX 118 иться ившийся .
SFX 118 иться ившегося .
SFX 118 иться ившемуся .
SFX 118 иться ившегося .
SFX 118 иться ившийся .
SFX 118 иться ившимся .
SFX 118 иться ившемся .
SFX 118 иться ившаяся .
SFX 118 иться ившейся .
SFX 118 иться ившейся .
SFX 118 иться ившуюся .
SFX 118 иться ившейся .
SFX 118 иться ившеюся .
SFX 118 иться ившейся .
SFX 118 иться ившееся .
SFX 118 иться ившегося .
SFX 118 иться ившемуся .
SFX 118 иться ившееся .
SFX 118 иться ившимся .
SFX 118 иться ившемся .
SFX 118 иться ившиеся .
SFX 118 иться ившихся .
SFX 118 иться ившимся .
SFX 118 иться ившихся .
SFX 118 иться ившиеся .
SFX 118 иться ившимися .
SFX 118 иться ившихся .
SFX 118 иться 0 .

SFX 119 Y 70
SFX 119 иться иться .
SFX 119 иться усь .
SFX 119 иться имся .
SFX 119 иться ишься .
SFX 119 иться итесь .
SFX 119 иться ится .
SFX 119 иться атся .
SFX 119 иться ился .
SFX 119 иться илась .
SFX 119 иться илось .
SFX 119 иться ились .
SFX 119 иться ась .
SFX 119 иться ившись .
SFX 119 иться ься .
SFX 119 иться ьтесь .
SFX 119 иться ащийся .
SFX 119 иться ащегося .
SFX 119 иться ащемуся .
SFX 119 иться ащегося .
SFX 119 иться ащийся .
SFX 119 иться ащимся .
SFX 119 иться ащемся .
SFX 119 иться ащаяся .
SFX 119 иться ащейся .
SFX 119 иться ащейся .
SFX 119 иться ащуюся .
SFX 119 иться ащейся .
SFX 119 иться ащеюся .
SFX 119 иться ащейся .
SFX 119 иться ащееся .
SFX 119 иться ащегося .
SFX 119 иться ащемуся .
SFX 119 иться ащееся .
SFX 119 иться ащимся .
SFX 119 иться ащемся .
SFX 119 иться ащиеся .
SFX 119 иться ащихся .
SFX 119 иться ащимся .
SFX 119 иться ащихся .
SFX 119 иться ащиеся .
SFX 119 иться ащимися .
SFX 119 иться ащихся .
SFX 119 иться ившийся .
SFX 119 иться ившегося .
SFX 119 иться ившемуся .
SFX 119 иться ившегося .
SFX 119 иться ившийся .
SFX 119 иться ившимся .
SFX 119 иться ившемся .
SFX 119 иться ившаяся .
SFX 119 иться ившейся .
SFX 119 иться ившейся .
SFX 119 иться ившуюся .
SFX 119 иться ившейся .
SFX 119 иться ившеюся .
SFX 119 иться ившейся .
SFX 119 иться ившееся .
SFX 119 иться ившегося .
SFX 119 иться ившемуся .
SFX 119 иться ившееся .
SFX 119 иться ившимся .
SFX 119 иться ившемся .
SFX 119 иться ившиеся .
SFX 119 иться ившихся .
SFX 119 иться ившимся .
SFX 119 иться ившихся .
SFX 119 иться ившиеся .
SFX 119 иться ившимися .
SFX 119 иться ившихся .
SFX 119 иться 0 .

SFX 120 Y 2
SFX 120 0  .
SFX 120 0  .

SFX 121 Y 2
SFX 121 0  .
SFX 121 0  .
